Washington statutes.
RCW 19.130.050

Equipment not intended for connection to telephone network and used equipment located on customer's premises—Application of chapter.

This chapter shall not apply to equipment not intended for connection to the telephone network, nor to used equipment located on the customer's premises.

[ 1984 c 275 s 5.]